South Dakota, session 2026, HB1259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 10-4-24.14 be AMENDED:
10-4-24.14. The An application for the reduction of tax on a dwelling owned and
occupied by a paraplegic or an individual with the loss, or loss of use, of both lower
extremities, as provided in §§ 10-4-24.11 to 10-4-24.13, inclusive, must be annually
submitted on or before April first on forms prescribed by the secretary of revenue the
Department of Revenue, or on a website maintained by the department. The department
shall provide the form must be made available, and any application it receives online, to
the county treasurer who .
The county treasurer shall, upon the request of an applicant, assist the applicant
in completing the form application. The property owner shall sign the application under
penalty of perjury. The application must include the documentary evidence the county
treasurer deems necessary to assure validity of the claim.
Section 2. That § 10-4-40 be AMENDED:
10-4-40. Two hundred thousand dollars of the full and true value of the total
amount of a dwelling or portion thereof classified as owner-occupied pursuant to §§ 10-
13-39 to 10-13-40.4, inclusive, that is owned and occupied by a veteran who is rated as
permanently and totally disabled from a service-connected disability is exempt from
property taxation. The veteran shall apply for this partial exemption on a form prescribed
by the secretary of revenue the Department of Revenue, or on a website maintained by
the department. Any application or supporting document for this exemption is confidential.
Any A veteran who would otherwise qualify for this exemption but fails to comply with the
application deadline for the owner-occupied classification or the deadline for application
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1259B 2 1259
for this exemption may petition the board of county commissioners to recalculate the
taxes based upon the owner-occupied classification and this exemption and abate or
refund the difference in taxes pursuant to chapter 10-18.
If the director of equalization determines that the veteran receives an exemption
for the veteran's dwelling pursuant to this section, the veteran retains that exemption
until the property ownership is transferred, the veteran does not occupy the dwelling, or
the property has a change in use. If the legal description of property is changed or
amended and the veteran continues to reside in the dwelling, the veteran retains the
exemption provided by this section.
Section 3. That § 10-4-41 be AMENDED:
10-4-41. Two hundred thousand dollars of the full and true value of the total
amount of a dwelling, or portion thereof, classified as owner-occupied pursuant to §§ 10-
13-39 to 10-13-40.4, inclusive, is exempt from property taxation if owned and occupied
by:
(1) The surviving spouse of a veteran who was rated as permanently and totally
disabled from a service-connected disability; or
(2) The surviving spouse of a veteran, who receives dependency and indemnity
compensation from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as a result of
the veteran's service-connected death.
The surviving spouse shall apply for this partial exemption on a form prescribed by
the secretary of revenue the Department of Revenue, or on a website maintained by the
department. Any application or supporting document for this exemption is confidential.
Any A surviving spouse who would otherwise qualify for this exemption but fails to comply
with the application deadline for the owner-occupied classification or the deadline for
application for this exemption may petition the board of county commissioners to
recalculate the taxes based upon the owner-occupied classification and this exemption
and abate or refund the difference in taxes pursuant to chapter 10-18.
If the director of equalization determines that the surviving spouse receives an
exemption for the dwelling pursuant to this section, the surviving spouse retains that
exemption until the property ownership is transferred, the surviving spouse does not
occupy the dwelling, the surviving spouse remarries, or the property has a change in use.
If the legal description of property is changed or amended and the surviving spouse
continues to reside in the dwelling, the surviving spouse retains the exemption provided
by this section.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1259B 3 1259
Section 4. That § 10-6A-4 be AMENDED:
10-6A-4. The An application for the real property tax assessment freeze provided
under this chapter shall must be annually submitted to the county treasurer on or before
April first on forms prescribed by the secretary of revenue, or on a website maintained by
the department. The department shall provide the form shall be made available, and any
application it receives online, to the county treasurer who.
The county treasurer shall, upon request of an applicant, assist the applicant in
completing the form application. The property owner shall sign the certificate application
under penalty of perjury. A person failing to comply with the April first deadline for the
previous year, but otherwise qualifying for the real property tax assessment freeze
provided under this chapter, may petition the board of county commissioners to
recalculate the taxes based on the valuation the person would have received under this
program and abate the difference in taxes.
Section 5. That § 10-6B-9 be AMENDED:
10-6B-9. Claims An application for a reduction of real property taxes under this
chapter shall be made annually must be annually submitted to the county treasurer on or
before April first upon forms prescribed by the secretary of revenue. Forms shall be made
available of the Department of Revenue, or on a website maintained by the department.
The department shall provide the form, and any application it receives online, to the
county treasurers who treasurer.
The county treasurer shall, upon request of a claimant an applicant, assist the
claimant applicant in completing the application.
Section 6. That § 10-6C-3 be AMENDED:
10-6C-3. To be eligible for the prohibition on the collection of real property taxes
under this chapter, a person must submit an application annually, on or before April first,
to the county treasurer in the county where the person's property is located. The
application must be made on forms prescribed by the secretary in rules promulgated
pursuant to chapter 1-26, or on a website maintained by the department. The secretary
shall make available to each county treasurer, forms for the property tax program and
any application it receives online. Each county treasurer shall, upon request of an
applicant, assist the applicant in completing the forms application.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1259B 4 1259
Section 7. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-13:
For purposes of receiving applications for the property tax relief programs pursuant
to §§ 10-4-24.14, 10-4-40, 10-4-41, 10-6A-4, 10-6B-9, and 10-6C-3, and 10-18A-7, the
Department of Revenue shall maintain a public website where property owners may
submit applications, and the documentary evidence therefor, for property tax relief.
Section 8. That § 10-18A-7 be AMENDED:
10-18A-7. Claims An application for a refund of real property taxes under this chapter shall
must be made annually on or before July first upon on forms prescribed by the secretary of
revenue. Forms shall be made available of the Department of Revenue, or on a website
maintained by the department. The department shall provide the form, and any application it
receives online, to the county treasurers who treasurer.
The county treasurer shall, upon request of a claimant an applicant, assist the claimant
applicant in completing the application. In case of sickness, absence, or other disability of the
claimant applicant, or if other good cause exists, the secretary may extend for a period not
to exceed six months the time for filing a claim an application.
Section 8. This Act is effective beginning July 1, 2028.

Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.